Arkansas, session 2025, HB1637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:


SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-9-115 is amended to read as follows:
7-9-115. Furnishing ballot title and popular name to election
commissioners.
(a) Not less than eighteen (18) days before the election, the
Secretary of State shall furnish the State Board of Election Commissioners
and county boards of election commissioners a certified copy of the ballot
title and popular name for each proposed measure and each referred act to be
voted upon at the ensuing election.
(b) If the Department of Finance and Administration prepared a fiscal
impact statement for a statewide measure under § 7-9-128 or for a
*MBM098*
03-17-2025 11:31:10 MBM098

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1637
legislatively referred constitutional amendment under § 7-9-206, the fiscal
impact statement shall be furnished to the State Board of Election
Commissioners and county boards of election commissioners along with the
ballot title and popular name under subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-9-117 is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d) If the Department of Finance and Administration prepared a fiscal
impact statement for a statewide measure under § 7-9-128 for inclusion on the
ballot, the fiscal impact statement shall be included on the ballot.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 9, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-9-128. Fiscal impact statement.
(a) Within ten (10) business days of a sponsor submitting an original
draft under § 7-9-107, the Attorney General shall determine if the proposed
measure has a financial impact by virtue of:
(1) Increasing or decreasing state revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness; or
(2) Establishing, repealing, or modifying one (1) or more taxes.
(b) If the Attorney General certifies a ballot title and popular name
under § 7-9-107(d) and he or she determines that the proposed measure has a
financial impact under subsection (a) of this section, he or she shall refer
the proposed measure and the certified ballot title and popular name within
three (3) business days to the Department of Finance and Administration.
(c) Upon the referral of a proposed measure under subsection (b) of
this section, the department shall prepare an unbiased, good faith fiscal
impact statement for the proposed measure, not exceeding one hundred (100)
words plus one hundred (100) additional words per revenue source created or
impacted by the proposed measure, that contains:
(1) A description of the total estimated fiscal impact of the
proposed measure over the time period or time periods determined by the
department to be most useful in understanding the estimated fiscal impact of
the proposed measure;
(2) If the proposed measure would increase taxes, decrease
taxes, or impose a new tax, a dollar amount representing the total estimated
03-17-2025 11:31:10 MBM098

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1637
increase or decrease for each type of tax affected under the proposed
measure, a dollar amount showing the estimated amount of a new tax, and a
dollar amount representing the total estimated increase or decrease in taxes
under the proposed measure;
(3) If the proposed measure would increase a particular tax or
tax rate, the tax percentage difference and the tax percentage increase for
each tax or tax rate increased;
(4) If the proposed measure would result in the issuance or a
change in the status of bonds, notes, or other debt instruments, a dollar
amount representing the total estimated increase or decrease in public debt
under the proposed law;
(5) A dollar amount representing the estimated cost or savings,
if any, to state government entities under the proposed measure;
(6) If the proposed measure would increase costs to state
government, a listing of all sources of funding for the estimated costs; and
(7) A concise description and analysis titled “Funding Source",
not to exceed one hundred (100) words for each funding source, of the funding
source information.
(d) Following the certification of a ballot title and popular name
under § 7-9-107(d), the sponsor of the proposed measure may provide
information to the department that he or she believes would assist the
department in preparing the unbiased, good faith fiscal impact statement
under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) If the department requests information from a state agency or
other public entity that is necessary for the completion of the fiscal impact
statement under this section, the state agency or other public entity shall
provide the requested information by the date identified by the department.
(f) If the department determines that the fiscal impact of the
proposed measure cannot be determined, the department may indicate that the
fiscal impact cannot be determined in the fiscal impact statement.
(g) The department shall forward the fiscal impact statement under
subsection (c) of this section to the Secretary of State by the seventy-sixth
day before the general election.
(h)(1) If the fiscal impact statement under subsection (c) of this
section exceeds two hundred (200) words, the department shall prepare an
additional version of the fiscal impact statement that does not exceed two
03-17-2025 11:31:10 MBM098

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1637
hundred (200) words.
(2) The version of the fiscal impact statement that does not
exceed two hundred (200) words shall be included on the ballot under § 7-9-
117(d) in lieu of the version of the fiscal impact statement exceeding two
hundred (200) words.
(i) The sponsor of a proposed measure shall not be charged any costs
associated with the preparation of the fiscal impact statement under this
section.
(j) When determining the number of words in a fiscal impact statement
under this section, the department shall not include numerals and associated
special characters in the word count, including without limitations dollars
signs and percentage symbols.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 9, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-9-206. Fiscal impact statement.
(a) If the General Assembly passes a joint resolution proposing an
amendment to the Arkansas Constitution, the Department of Finance and
Administration shall determine if the proposed measure has a financial impact
by virtue of:
(1) Increasing or decreasing state revenues, costs,
expenditures, or indebtedness; or
(2) Establishing, repealing, or modifying one (1) or more taxes.
(b) If the department determines that the proposed amendment to the
Arkansas Constitution has a financial impact under subsection (a) of this
section, the department shall prepare an unbiased, good faith fiscal impact
statement for the proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution, not
exceeding one hundred (100) words plus one hundred (100) additional words per
revenue source created or impacted by the proposed amendment to the Arkansas
Constitution, that contains:
(1) A description of the total estimated fiscal impact of the
proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution over the time period or time
periods determined by the department to be most useful in understanding the
estimated fiscal impact of the proposed amendment to the Arkansas
Constitution;
(2) If the proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution would
03-17-2025 11:31:10 MBM098

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1637
increase taxes, decrease taxes, or impose a new tax, a dollar amount
representing the total estimated increase or decrease for each type of tax
affected under the proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution, a dollar
amount showing the estimated amount of a new tax, and a dollar amount
representing the total estimated increase or decrease in taxes under the
proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution;
(3) If the proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution would
increase a particular tax or tax rate, the tax percentage difference and the
tax percentage increase for each tax or tax rate increased;
(4) If the proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution would
result in the issuance or a change in the status of bonds, notes, or other
debt instruments, a dollar amount representing the total estimated increase
or decrease in public debt under the proposed law;
(5) A dollar amount representing the estimated cost or savings,
if any, to state government entities under the proposed amendment to the
Arkansas Constitution;
(6) If the proposed amendment to the Arkansas Constitution would
increase costs to state government, a listing of all sources of funding for
the estimated costs; and
(7) A concise description and analysis titled “Funding Source",
not to exceed one hundred (100) words for each funding source, of the funding
source information.
(c) Following the passage of a joint resolution proposing an amendment
to the Arkansas Constitution, the sponsor of the joint resolution may provide
information to the department that he or she believes would assist the
department in preparing the unbiased, good faith fiscal impact statement
under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) If the department requests information from a state agency or
other public entity that is necessary for the completion of the fiscal impact
statement under this section, the state agency or other public entity shall
provide the requested information by the date identified by the department.
(e) If the department determines that the fiscal impact of the
proposed measure cannot be determined, the department may indicate that the
fiscal impact cannot be determined in the fiscal impact statement.
(f) The department shall forward the fiscal impact statement under
subsection (b) of this section to the Secretary of State by the seventy-sixth
03-17-2025 11:31:10 MBM098

As Engrossed: H3/11/25 H3/17/25 HB1637
day before the general election.
(g) The fiscal impact statement prepared by the department under this
section shall be included on the ballot in the same manner as a fiscal impact
statement prepared under § 7-9-128.
(h)(1) If the fiscal impact statement under subsection (b) of this
section exceeds two hundred (200) words, the department shall prepare an
additional version of the fiscal impact statement that does not exceed two
hundred (200) words.
(2) The version of the fiscal impact statement that does not
exceed two hundred (200) words shall be included on the ballot in lieu of the
version of the fiscal impact statement exceeding two hundred (200) words.
(i) When determining the number of words in a fiscal impact statement
under this section, the department shall not include numerals and associated
special characters in the word count, including without limitations dollars
signs and percentage symbols.

SECTION 5. DO NOT CODIFY. Measures certified before effective date of
act.
(a)(1) If the Attorney General certifies the ballot title and popular
name of a proposed measure under § 7-9-107(d) before the effective date of
this act, the sponsor shall submit the following information to the
Department of Finance and Administration within ten (10) business days of the
effective date of this act:
(A) The full text of the proposed measure;
(B) The certified ballot title for the proposed measure;
and
(C) The certified popular name for the proposed measure.
(2) The sponsor may also submit information to the department he
or she believes would assist the department in preparing an unbiased, good
faith fiscal impact statement of the proposed measure.
(b) The department shall prepare an unbiased, good faith fiscal impact
statement for the proposed measure in the manner required by § 7-9-128.

/s/Ray


03-17-2025 11:31:10 MBM098